North Carolina, session 2025, HB1195.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. SUPPORTING COMMUNITY-BASED ORGANIZATIONS

ESTABLISHMENT OF MATERNAL CARE ACCESS GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 1.1.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
*H1195-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Culturally respectful congruent. – Sensitive to and respectful of the preferred
cultural values, beliefs, world view, and practices of the patient, and aware
that cultural differences between patients and health care providers or other
service providers must be proactively addressed to ensure that patients receive
equitable, high-quality services that meet their needs.
(2) Department. – The North Carolina Department of Health and Human
Services.
(3) Postpartum. – The one-year period beginning on the last day of a woman's
pregnancy.
SECTION 1.1.(b) Establishment of Grant Program. – The Department shall
establish and administer a Maternal Care Access Grant Program to award competitive grants to
eligible entities to establish or expand programs for the prevention of maternal mortality and
severe maternal morbidity among black women. The Department shall establish eligibility
requirements for program participation which shall, at a minimum, require that applicants be
community-based organizations offering programs and resources aligned with evidence-based
practices for improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 1.1.(c) Outreach and Application Assistance. – Beginning July 1, 2026,
the Department shall (i) conduct outreach to encourage eligible applicants to apply for grants
under this program and (ii) provide application assistance to eligible applicants on best practices
for applying for grants under this program. In conducting the outreach required by this section,
the Department shall give special consideration to eligible applicants that meet the following
criteria:
(1) Are based in, and provide support for, communities with high rates of adverse
maternal health outcomes and significant racial and ethnic disparities in
maternal health outcomes.
(2) Are led by black women.
(3) Offer programs and resources that are aligned with evidence-based practices
for improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 1.1.(d) Grant Awards. – In awarding grants under this section, the
Department shall, to the extent possible, award grants to recipients to reflect different areas of
the State. The Department shall not award a single grant for less than ten thousand dollars
($10,000) or more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per grant recipient. In selecting grant
recipients, the Department shall give special consideration to eligible applicants that meet all of
the following criteria:
(1) Meet all of the criteria specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of subsection
(c) of this section.
(2) Offer programs and resources designed in consultation with and intended for
black women.
(3) Offer programs and resources in the communities in which they are located
that include any of the following activities:
a. Promoting maternal mental health and maternal substance use disorder
treatments that are aligned with evidence-based practices for
improving maternal mental health outcomes for black women.
b. Addressing social determinants of health for women in the prenatal
and postpartum periods, including, but not limited to, any of the
following:
1. Inadequate housing.
2. Transportation barriers.
3. Poor nutrition and a lack of access to healthy foods.
4. Need for lactation support.
Page 2 House Bill 1195-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
5. Need for lead abatement and other efforts to improve air and
water quality.
6. Lack of access to child care.
7. Need for baby supplies such as diapers, formula, clothing, baby
and child equipment, and safe car seat installation.
8. Need for wellness and stress management programs.
9. Education about maternal health and well-being.
10. Need for coordination across safety net and social support
services and programs.
11. Barriers to employment.
c. Promoting evidence-based health literacy and pregnancy, childbirth,
and parenting education for women in the prenatal and postpartum
periods, including group-based programs and peer support groups.
d. Providing individually tailored support from doulas and other perinatal
health workers to women from pregnancy through the postpartum
period.
e. Providing culturally respectful congruent training to perinatal health
workers such as doulas, community health workers, peer supporters,
certified lactation consultants, nutritionists and dietitians, social
workers, home visitors, and navigators.
f. Conducting or supporting research on issues affecting black maternal
health.
g. Developing other programs and resources that address
community-specific needs for women in the prenatal and postpartum
periods and are aligned with evidence-based practices for improving
maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 1.1.(e) Technical Assistance to Grant Recipients. – The Department shall
provide technical assistance to grant recipients regarding all of the following:
(1) Capacity building to establish or expand programs to prevent adverse maternal
health outcomes among black women.
(2) Best practices in data collection, measurement, evaluation, and reporting.
(3) Planning centered around sustaining programs implemented with grant funds
to prevent maternal mortality and severe maternal morbidity among black
women when the grant funds have been expended.
SECTION 1.1.(f) Reports. – The Department shall submit the following reports on
the grant program authorized by this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on
Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division:
(1) A report by October 1, 2027, that includes at least all of the following
components:
a. A detailed report on funds expended for the program for the 2026-2027
fiscal year.
b. An assessment of the effectiveness of outreach efforts by the
Department during the application process in diversifying the pool of
grant recipients.
c. Recommendations for future outreach efforts to diversify the pool of
grant recipients for this program and other related grant programs, as
well as for funding opportunities related to the social determinants of
maternal health.
(2) A report by October 1, 2028, that includes at least all of the following
components:
House Bill 1195-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
a. A detailed report on funds expended for the program for the 2027-2028
fiscal year.
b. An assessment of the effectiveness of programs funded by grants
awarded under this section in improving maternal health outcomes for
black women.
c. Recommendations for future grant programs to be administered by the
Department and for future funding opportunities for community-based
organizations to improve maternal health outcomes for black women
through programs and resources that are aligned with evidence-based
practices for improving maternal health outcomes for black women.

APPROPRIATIONS TO IMPLEMENT PART I
SECTION 1.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of five million dollars
($5,000,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used and allocated
as follows:
(1) Ninety-three thousand five hundred thirteen dollars ($93,513) to establish a
full-time, permanent Public Health Program Coordinator IV position within
the Department of Health and Human Services dedicated to performing the
following duties:
a. Providing application assistance to Maternal Care Access Grant
Program applicants.
b. Providing technical assistance to Maternal Care Access Grant Program
recipients.
c. Preparing the reports due under Section 1.1(f) of this Part.
(2) Four million nine hundred six thousand four hundred eighty-seven dollars
($4,906,487) to be allocated to the Maternal Care Access Grant Program
authorized by Section 1.1 of this Part. The Department of Health and Human
Services may use up to one percent (1%) of these funds for administrative
purposes related to the grant program. The balance of these funds shall be used
to operate the grant program.
SECTION 1.2.(b) The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to
hire one full-time, permanent Public Health Program Coordinator IV position to perform the
duties described in subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.3. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART II. IMPLICIT BIAS IN HEALTH CARE
SECTION 2.1.(a) Part 5 of Article 1B of Chapter 130A of the General Statutes is
amended by adding two new sections to read:
"§ 130A-33.62. Department to establish implicit bias training program for health care
professionals engaged in perinatal care.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Health care professional. – A licensed physician or other health care provider
licensed, registered, accredited, or certified to perform perinatal care and
regulated under the authority of a health care professional licensing authority.
(2) Health care professional licensing authority. – The Department of Health and
Human Services or an agency, board, council, or committee with the authority
to impose training or education requirements or licensure fees as a condition
of practicing in this State as a health care professional.
(3) Implicit bias. – A bias in judgment or behavior that results from subtle
cognitive processes, including implicit prejudice and implicit stereotypes, that
Page 4 House Bill 1195-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
often operate at a level below conscious awareness and without intentional
control.
(4) Implicit prejudice. – Prejudicial negative feelings or beliefs about a group that
a person holds without being aware of them.
(5) Implicit stereotypes. – The unconscious attributions of particular qualities to
a member of a certain social group that are influenced by experience and based
on learned associations between various qualities and social categories,
including race and gender.
(6) Perinatal care. – The provision of care during pregnancy, labor, delivery, and
postpartum and neonatal periods.
(7) Perinatal facility. – A hospital, clinic, or birthing center that provides perinatal
care in this State.
(b) The Department, in collaboration with (i) community-based organizations led by
black women that serve primarily black birthing people and (ii) a historically black college or
university or other institution that primarily serves minority populations, shall create or identify
an evidence-based implicit bias training program for health care professionals involved in
perinatal care. The implicit bias training program shall include, at a minimum, all of the following
components:
(1) Identification of previous or current unconscious biases and misinformation.
(2) Identification of personal, interpersonal, institutional, structural, and cultural
barriers to inclusion.
(3) Corrective measures to decrease implicit bias at the interpersonal and
institutional levels, including ongoing policies and practices for that purpose.
(4) Information about the effects of implicit bias, including, but not limited to,
ongoing personal effects of racism and the historical and contemporary
exclusion and oppression of minority communities.
(5) Information about cultural identity across racial or ethnic groups.
(6) Information about how to communicate more effectively across identities,
including racial, ethnic, religious, and gender identities.
(7) Information about power dynamics and organizational decision making.
(8) Trauma-informed care best practices and an emphasis on shared decision
making between providers and patients.
(9) Information about health inequities within the perinatal care field, including
information on how implicit bias impacts maternal and infant health
outcomes.
(10) Perspectives of diverse, local constituency groups and experts on particular
racial, identity, cultural, and provider-community relations issues in the
community.
(11) Information about socioeconomic bias.
(12) Information about reproductive justice.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 90 or Chapter 93B of the General Statutes,
or any other provision of law to the contrary, all health care professionals are required to complete
the implicit bias training program established under this section as follows:
(1) Health care professionals who hold a current license, registration,
accreditation, or certification on December 31, 2026, shall complete the
training program no later than December 31, 2027.
(2) Health care professionals issued an initial license, registration, accreditation,
or certification on or after January 1, 2027, shall complete the training
program no later than one year after the date of issuance.
A health care professional licensing authority shall not renew the license, registration,
accreditation, or certification of a health care professional unless the health care professional
House Bill 1195-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provides proof of completion of the training program established under this section within the
24-month period leading up to the date of the renewal application.
(d) The Department is encouraged to seek opportunities to make the implicit bias training
program established under this section available to all health care professionals and to promote
its use among the following groups:
(1) All maternity care providers and any employees who interact with pregnant
and postpartum individuals in the provider setting, including front desk
employees, sonographers, schedulers, health system-employed lactation
consultants, hospital or health system administrators, security staff, and other
employees.
(2) Undergraduate programs that funnel into health professions schools.
(3) Providers of the special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants,
and children under section 17 of the Child Nutrition Act of 1966.
(4) Obstetric emergency simulation trainings or related trainings.
(5) Emergency department employees, emergency medical technicians, and other
specialized health care providers who interact with pregnant and postpartum
individuals.
(e) The Department shall collect the following information for the purpose of informing
ongoing improvements to the implicit bias training program:
(1) Data on the causes of maternal mortality.
(2) Rates of maternal mortality, including rates distinguished by age, race,
ethnicity, socioeconomic status, and geographic location within this State.
(3) Other factors the Department deems relevant for assessing and improving the
implicit bias training program.
"§ 130A-33.63. Rights of perinatal care patients.
(a) A patient receiving care at a perinatal care facility, defined as a hospital, clinic, or
birthing center that provides perinatal care in this State, has the following rights:
(1) To be informed of continuing health care requirements following discharge.
(2) To be informed that, if the patient so authorizes, and to the extent permitted
by law, the hospital or health care facility may provide to a friend or family
member information about the patient's continuing health care requirements
following discharge.
(3) To actively participate in decisions regarding the patient's medical care and
the right to refuse treatment.
(4) To receive appropriate pain assessment and treatment.
(5) To receive care and treatment free from discrimination on the basis of age,
race, ethnicity, color, religion, ancestry, disability, medical condition, genetic
information, marital status, sex, gender identity, gender expression, sexual
orientation, socioeconomic status, citizenship, nationality, immigration status,
primary language, or language proficiency.
(6) To receive information on how to file a complaint with the Division of Health
Service Regulation or the Human Rights Commission or both about any
violation of these rights.
(b) Each perinatal care facility shall provide to each perinatal care patient upon admission
to the facility, or as soon as reasonably practical following admission to the facility, a written
copy of the rights enumerated in subsection (a) of this section. The facility may provide this
information to the patient by electronic means, and it may be provided with other notices
regarding patient rights."
SECTION 2.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
Page 6 House Bill 1195-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
establish and administer the implicit bias training program for health care professionals engaged
in perinatal care authorized by G.S. 130A-33.62, as enacted by this act.
SECTION 2.2. Section 2.1(a) of this Part becomes effective October 1, 2026.
Section 2.1(b) of this Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART III. SUPPORTING AND DIVERSIFYING TRAINING PROGRAMS FOR
LACTATION SUPPORT PROFESSIONALS
SECTION 3.1.(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Historically Black Colleges and Universities or HBCUs. – Institutions of
higher education that were founded to educate black citizens who were
historically restricted from attending predominantly white institutions of
higher education.
(2) Lactation support professionals. – Includes lactation consultants, counselors,
peer counselors, and educators trained in breast feeding or chest feeding
practices, lactation care, and lactation services.
(3) Lactation services. – The clinical application of scientific principles and a
multidisciplinary body of evidence for evaluation, problem identification,
treatment, education, and consultation to childbearing families regarding
lactation care and services.
(4) Maternity care services. – Health care related to an individual's pregnancy,
childbirth, or postpartum recovery.
SECTION 3.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the purposes of recruiting, training, and
retaining a diverse workforce of lactation support professionals in North Carolina by supporting
the infrastructure and sustainability of training programs for lactation support professionals at
Historically Black Colleges and Universities located within the State. These funds shall be
distributed equally among Bennett College, Fayetteville State University, Johnson C. Smith
University, North Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University, and North Carolina
Central University to cover costs incurred by each university for administering a training program
for lactation support professionals, including, but not limited to:
(1) Leasing or other costs for teaching facilities or approved clinical training sites.
(2) Student aid or scholarships.
(3) Compensation for teachers and preceptors of training programs for lactation
support professionals.
SECTION 3.1.(c) The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide
technical assistance to Bennett College, Fayetteville State University, Johnson C. Smith
University, North Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University, and North Carolina
Central University with respect to the following:
(1) Developing culturally appropriate content for State-funded training programs
for lactation support professionals.
(2) Recruiting persons from historically marginalized populations to enroll in
training programs for lactation support professionals offered at these
universities.
(3) Recruiting historically underutilized providers to serve as teachers and
preceptors in the training programs for lactation support professionals offered
at these universities.
(4) Identifying rural and medically underserved areas of the State experiencing a
shortage of lactation support professionals in order to recruit program
graduates to work in these areas.
House Bill 1195-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3.1.(d) By May 1, 2029, the Department of Health and Human Services
shall evaluate and submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services and the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the benefits
received by the State as a result of funding training programs for lactation support professionals
at North Carolina Agricultural & Technical State University and Johnson C. Smith University.
The report shall include at least all of the following information and recommendations:
(1) The total number of lactation support professionals who received training at
one of the State-funded HBCU lactation programs, broken down by (i) race
and ethnicity and (ii) chosen work site, such as hospital, provider office, or
community-based organization.
(2) A review of the prenatal and postpartum experiences of patients who received
lactation services from a health care professional who graduated from one of
the State-funded HBCU training programs for lactation support professionals.
The review shall address patients' experiences relative to the following:
a. Health insurance coverage for maternity care services, including
telehealth lactation support services.
b. Contributing factors to population-based disparities in breast feeding
and chest feeding outcomes, including bias and discrimination toward
patients who are members of racial and ethnic minority groups.
c. Patient satisfaction with the services received from these lactation
support professionals.
d. Breast feeding or chest feeding initiation and duration rates of patients
who received lactation services from these lactation support
professionals.
SECTION 3.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART IV. PERINATAL EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM
SECTION 4.1.(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Department. – The North Carolina Department of Health and Human
Services.
(2) Perinatal education program. – A program that operates for the primary
purpose of educating pregnant women and their families about healthy
pregnancy, preparation for labor and birth, breast feeding, newborn care, or
any combination of these.
SECTION 4.1.(b) Establishment of Grant Program. – The Department shall
establish and administer a Perinatal Education Grant Program to award competitive grants to
eligible entities to establish or expand perinatal education programs in rural, underserved, or
low-wealth areas of the State. The Department shall establish eligibility requirements for
program participation which shall, at a minimum, require that applicants be community-based
organizations that offer perinatal education and resources aligned with evidence-based practices
for improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 4.1.(c) Outreach and Application Assistance. – Beginning September 1,
2026, the Department shall (i) conduct outreach to encourage eligible applicants to apply for
grants under this program and (ii) provide application assistance to eligible applicants on best
practices for applying for grants under this program. In conducting the outreach required by this
section, the Department shall give special consideration to eligible applicants that meet the
following criteria:
(1) Are based in, and provide support for, communities with high rates of adverse
maternal health outcomes and significant racial and ethnic disparities in
maternal health outcomes.
(2) Are led by black women.
Page 8 House Bill 1195-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Offer programs and resources that are aligned with evidence-based practices
for improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 4.1.(d) Grant Awards. – In awarding grants under this section, to the
extent possible, the grant recipients shall reflect different areas of the State. The Department shall
not award a single grant for less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more than fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) per grant recipient.
SECTION 4.1.(e) Termination of Grant Program. – The Perinatal Grant Program
authorized by this section expires on June 30, 2028.
SECTION 4.1.(f) Report. – By October 1, 2029, the Department shall submit a report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal
Research Division that includes at least all of the following components:
(1) A detailed report on funds expended for the program for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year.
(2) An assessment of the effectiveness of programs funded by grants awarded
under this section in improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
(3) Recommendations for future grant programs to be administered by the
Department and for future funding opportunities for community-based
organizations to improve maternal health outcomes for black women through
programs and resources that are aligned with evidence-based practices for
improving maternal health outcomes for black women.
SECTION 4.1.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, the sum of three million dollars
($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to fund the Perinatal Education
Grant Program authorized by this section. The Department of Health and Human Services may
use up to five percent (5%) of the funds allocated for this grant program for administrative
purposes related to establishment and administration of the Perinatal Education Grant Program.
SECTION 4.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART V. MOMNI-BUS INITIATIVE
SECTION 5.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health (DPH), the sum of six million five
hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
create a Momni-Bus Initiative. The purpose of the Momni-Bus Initiative is to fund efforts to
expand access to maternal and infant health care and parenting programs, supports, and services
to families residing in geographic areas of the State where there is limited or no access to
maternity care services, including obstetric providers, a hospital or birth center, prenatal care, or
postpartum care. As part of this initiative, the Department shall allocate and use the funds
appropriated by this section as follows:
(1) One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to provide a directed
grant to the March of Dimes, Inc., a nonprofit corporation in North Carolina,
to support its work toward ending preventable maternal health risks and
deaths, ending preventable preterm birth and infant death, and closing the
health equity gap.
(2) Five million dollars ($5,000,000) to award directed grants on a competitive
basis to nonprofit, community-based, and faith-based organizations that offer
programs, supports, and services aligned with evidence-based practices for a
healthy pregnancy through the postpartum period, infant health and care, and
parenting programs, supports, and services. The DPH shall establish an
application process and eligibility criteria for awarding the grants authorized
under this subdivision. By October 1, 2028, and October 1, 2029, the DPH
shall submit a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
House Bill 1195-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on grants awarded
under this subdivision. The report shall include at least all of the following:
a. The identity and a brief description of the community health activities
performed by each grantee.
b. The amount of funding awarded to each grantee.
c. The number of persons served by each grantee.
SECTION 5.2. This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026.

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 10 House Bill 1195-First Edition